Illinois, session 104th, SB3286.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unemployment Insurance Act is amended by 5changing Section 612 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 405/612)  (from Ch. 48, par. 442)7    Sec. 612. Academic personnel; ineligibility between 8academic years or terms.9    A. Benefits based on wages for services which are 10employment under the provisions of Sections 211.1, 211.2, and 11302C shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, 12and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the 13basis of wages for other services which are employment under 14this Act; except that:15        1. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 16    the basis of wages for employment in an instructional, 17    research, or principal administrative capacity performed 18    for an institution of higher education, for any week which 19    begins during the period between two successive academic 20    years, or during a similar period between two regular 21    terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of 22    paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's 23    contract, if the individual has a contract or contracts to   SB3286- 2 -LRB104 17837 SPS 31271 b1    perform services in any such capacity for any institution 2    or institutions of higher education for both such academic 3    years or both such terms.4        This paragraph 1 shall apply with respect to any week 5    which begins prior to January 1, 1978.6        2. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 7    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 8    capacity other than those referred to in paragraph 1, 9    performed for an institution of higher learning, for any 10    week which begins after September 30, 1983, during a 11    period between two successive academic years or terms, if 12    the individual performed such service in the first of such 13    academic years or terms and there is a reasonable 14    assurance that the individual will perform such service in 15    the second of such academic years or terms.16        3. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 17    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 18    capacity other than those referred to in paragraph 1, 19    performed for an institution of higher education, for any 20    week which begins after January 5, 1985, during an 21    established and customary vacation period or holiday 22    recess, if the individual performed such service in the 23    period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 24    recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the 25    individual will perform such service in the period 26    immediately following such vacation period or holiday   SB3286- 3 -LRB104 17837 SPS 31271 b1    recess.2    B. Benefits based on wages for services which are 3employment under the provisions of Sections 211.1 and 211.2 4shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and 5subject to the same conditions, as benefits payable on the 6basis of wages for other services which are employment under 7this Act, except that:8        1. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 9    the basis of wages for service in employment in an 10    instructional, research, or principal administrative 11    capacity performed for an educational institution, for any 12    week which begins after December 31, 1977, during a period 13    between two successive academic years, or during a similar 14    period between two regular terms, whether or not 15    successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave 16    provided for in the individual's contract, if the 17    individual performed such service in the first of such 18    academic years (or terms) and if there is a contract or a 19    reasonable assurance that the individual will perform 20    service in any such capacity for any educational 21    institution in the second of such academic years (or 22    terms).23        2. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 24    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 25    capacity other than those referred to in paragraph 1, 26    performed for an educational institution, for any week   SB3286- 4 -LRB104 17837 SPS 31271 b1    which begins after December 31, 1977, during a period 2    between two successive academic years or terms, if the 3    individual performed such service in the first of such 4    academic years or terms and there is a reasonable 5    assurance that the individual will perform such service in 6    the second of such academic years or terms.7        3. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits, on 8    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 9    capacity performed for an educational institution, for any 10    week which begins after January 5, 1985, during an 11    established and customary vacation period or holiday 12    recess, if the individual performed such service in the 13    period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 14    recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the 15    individual will perform such service in the period 16    immediately following such vacation period or holiday 17    recess.18        4. An individual shall be ineligible for benefits on 19    the basis of wages for service in employment in any 20    capacity performed in an educational institution while in 21    the employ of an educational service agency for any week 22    which begins after January 5, 1985, (a) during a period 23    between two successive academic years or terms, if the 24    individual performed such service in the first of such 25    academic years or terms and there is a reasonable 26    assurance that the individual will perform such service in   SB3286- 5 -LRB104 17837 SPS 31271 b1    the second of such academic years or terms; and (b) during 2    an established and customary vacation period or holiday 3    recess, if the individual performed such service in the 4    period immediately before such vacation period or holiday 5    recess and there is a reasonable assurance that the 6    individual will perform such service in the period 7    immediately following such vacation period or holiday 8    recess. The term "educational service agency" means a 9    governmental agency or governmental entity which is 10    established and operated exclusively for the purpose of 11    providing such services to one or more educational 12    institutions.13    C. 1. If benefits are denied to any individual under the 14provisions of paragraph 2 of either subsection A or B of this 15Section for any week which begins on or after September 3, 1982 16and such individual is not offered a bona fide opportunity to 17perform such services for the educational institution for the 18second of such academic years or terms, such individual shall 19be entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week 20for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits as 21determined by the rules and regulations issued by the Director 22for the filing of claims for benefits, provided that such 23benefits were denied solely because of the provisions of 24paragraph 2 of either subsection A or B of this Section.25    2. If benefits on the basis of wages for service in 26employment in other than an instructional, research, or   SB3286- 6 -LRB104 17837 SPS 31271 b1principal administrative capacity performed in an educational 2institution while in the employ of an educational service 3agency are denied to any individual under the provisions of 4subparagraph (a) of paragraph 4 of subsection B and such 5individual is not offered a bona fide opportunity to perform 6such services in an educational institution while in the 7employ of an educational service agency for the second of such 8academic years or terms, such individual shall be entitled to 9a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the 10individual filed a timely claim for benefits as determined by 11the rules and regulations issued by the Director for the 12filing of claims for benefits, provided that such benefits 13were denied solely because of subparagraph (a) of paragraph 4 14of subsection B of this Section.15    D. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section or 16paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 500 to the contrary, 17with respect to a week of unemployment beginning on or after 18March 15, 2020, and before September 4, 2021 (including any 19week of unemployment beginning on or after January 1, 2021 and 20on or before June 25, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 21102-26)) and with respect to a week of unemployment beginning 22on or after June 1, 2026, benefits shall be payable to an 23individual on the basis of wages for employment in other than 24an instructional, research, or principal administrative 25capacity performed for an educational institution or an 26educational service agency under any of the circumstances   SB3286- 7 -LRB104 17837 SPS 31271 b1described in this Section, to the extent permitted under 2Section 3304(a)(6) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as 3long as the individual is otherwise eligible for benefits.4(Source: P.A. 101-633, eff. 6-5-20; 102-26, eff. 6-25-21; 5102-687, eff. 12-17-21.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.